Hawaii statutes.
[§514E-8.5] Classes of time share
interests. (a) A time share plan may establish classes of time share
interests defined by characteristics as the developer shall determine,
including but not limited to season, unit size, location, view, or otherwise.

(b) If one or more of the time share units
will not be available for the entire duration of the time share plan then, in
addition to other characteristics as the developer shall determine, the time
share interests shall be classified by duration. [L 1997, c 372, pt of
§1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next